District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4306

Use of explosives and drugs in fishing prohibited

Repealed.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 8(a), (e)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1601 to 22-1606.